Hawaii statutes.
[§323F-53] Approvals required. Any
documents associated with the transfer of a Maui regional facility or
facilities under this part shall be subject to review by the attorney general
and the director of finance in their capacity to advise the governor. [L 2015,
c 103, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next